West Virginia, session 2026, SB709.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 15. EMERGENCY AMBULANCE SERVICE ACT OF 1975. §7-15-17. Imposition and collection of special emergency ambulance service fee by county commission. (a) A county commission may, by ordinance, impose upon and collect from the users of emergency ambulance service within the county a special service fee, which shall be known as the "special emergency ambulance service fee." The proceeds from the imposition and collection of any special service fee shall be deposited in a special fund and used only to pay reasonable and necessary expenses actually incurred and the cost of buildings and equipment used in providing emergency ambulance service to residents of the county. The proceeds may be used to pay for, in whole or in part, the establishment, maintenance and operation of an authority, as provided for in this article: Provided, That an ambulance company or authority receiving funds from the special emergency ambulance fees collected pursuant to this section may not be precluded from making nonemergency transports.(b) A county commission may initiate collection of delinquent fees through filing an action in magistrate court or placement of a judgment lien, and is not required to pay court costs and fees associated with these processes. Upon a finding by a court that the delinquent fee is lawfully owed, all court fees relating to collection shall be imposed upon the person found to be delinquent.  The county commission may nominate a representative to perform the duties of this process.